Illinois, session 104th, SB3838.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Broadband Deployment Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) a goal of the State is to make available to its 9    citizens affordable, reliable, and state-of-the-art 10    Internet communications through the expansion, extension, 11    and general availability of broadband services and 12    technology and to encourage the adoption of broadband by 13    all citizens;14        (2) although broadband access has been extended to 15    many areas of the State, many rural areas remain unserved 16    and, although many neighborhoods in urban and suburban 17    areas have broadband options, some urban neighborhoods 18    remain unserved;19        (3) fair and equitable access to 21st century 20    technology is essential to (i) maximize the functionality 21    of educational resources and educational facilities that 22    enable children and adults to receive the best of future 23    teaching and learning methods, (ii) civic engagement,   SB3838- 2 -LRB104 20717 AAS 34217 b1    (iii) economic development, (iv) access to 2    state-of-the-art health care, (v) aging in place, (vi) 3    participation in a global economy, and (vii) the State's 4    farming communities; and5        (4) the use of highway rights-of-way to support 6    broadband infrastructure and services is compatible with 7    and similar to other uses of highway rights-of-way and 8    furthers the overall public interest by extending 9    broadband access to citizens of the State and eliminating 10    barriers to the widespread adoption of broadband Internet 11    access. 12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 13    "Broadband grant recipient" means a broadband service 14provider that is a telecommunications retailer, as defined in 15subsection (d) of Section 10 of the Telecommunications 16Infrastructure Maintenance Fee Act, that has been awarded 17grant funding pursuant to any State or federal grant program 18with the purpose of expanding broadband deployment and access 19to broadband services.20    "Broadband infrastructure" means aboveground or 21underground wires, cables, fiber optic lines, conduit, pipe, 22innerduct, or microduct for fiber optic or other cables and 23facilities, including ancillary equipment such as power 24supplies, backhaul, and support structures, that are used in 25the provision of broadband services.   SB3838- 3 -LRB104 20717 AAS 34217 b1    "Broadband service" means broadband Internet access 2service as defined in 47 CFR 8.1(b). 3    "Deploy" means, with respect to broadband infrastructure, 4to install, operate, maintain, access, inspect, upgrade, 5replace, repair, remove, and perform activities ancillary to 6those activities. 7    "Highway right-of-way" means the land, or interest 8therein, acquired for or devoted to a highway, as defined in 9the Illinois Highway Code. 10    "Property owner" does not include a public utility as 11defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.  12    Section 15. Rights-of-way. Conditional upon acquiring the 13proper agreement or permit with the highway right-of-way 14controller or holder, a broadband grant recipient may install, 15maintain, and use broadband infrastructure along a highway 16right-of-way. The broadband grant recipient shall comply with 17all applicable provisions of Section 9-113 of the Illinois 18Highway Code and relevant administrative rules.19    No property owner of property located within the highway 20right-of-way shall forbid or prevent a proposed broadband 21grant recipient from entering upon the property for purposes 22of and in connection with the deployment of broadband 23infrastructure, nor shall any such property owner forbid or 24prohibit the broadband grant recipient from deploying upon, 25beneath, or over that property broadband infrastructure   SB3838- 4 -LRB104 20717 AAS 34217 b1utilized by the broadband grant recipient for such broadband 2service. The property owner may be entitled to the payment of 3just compensation by the broadband grant recipient, as 4provided in Section 20, and the broadband grant recipient 5shall indemnify the owner of such property for any physical 6damage caused by deployment of the broadband infrastructure 7and service.8    Nothing in this Act shall be construed as reducing the 9ability of the Department of Transportation from exercising 10its authority to: (1) approve or deny permits for use of its 11right-of-way, (2) collect fees and compensation required as 12part of the Department of Transportation's administrative 13rules, and (3) manage the use of its right-of-way.  14    Section 20. Notice and compensation. 15    (a) The broadband grant recipient must notify the property 16owner in writing by sending notification to the property 17owner's address specified in the online or publicly available 18records of the applicable county assessor (i) by the United 19States Postal Service, certified mail, return receipt 20requested; (ii) by a designated private delivery service, as 21defined by the Internal Revenue Service, that provides the 22same function as certified mail with return receipt; or (iii) 23by personally serving the notification. The property owner 24shall be notified at least 14 days, but not more than 60 days, 25prior to the broadband grant recipient entering upon such   SB3838- 5 -LRB104 20717 AAS 34217 b1property for purposes of or in connection with the deployment 2of broadband infrastructure. The notice shall include the 3following information: 4        (1) the address of the property; 5        (2) the name of the broadband grant recipient and 6    contact information for notice to the broadband grant 7    recipient; 8        (3) the anticipated date of the proposed installation, 9    maintenance, repair, or removal of the broadband 10    infrastructure and projected length of time required to 11    complete the installation, maintenance, or repair; 12        (4) information as to the time within which the owner 13    may give notice and demand just compensation under this 14    Section if the property owner believes that the property 15    is diminished in value due to the burden on the property 16    from the expanded use of the right-of-way; 17        (5) the manner and method of, and the detailed design 18    and construction plans for, such installation, 19    maintenance, repair, and removal, including the location 20    of the proposed entry and path of broadband facilities 21    proposed to be placed, repaired, maintained, or removed 22    upon the property; and 23        (6) a statement absolving the property owner or the 24    property owner's tenant from liability for any damages to 25    broadband infrastructure that occur in the event of normal 26    property use, including normal farming operations if the   SB3838- 6 -LRB104 20717 AAS 34217 b1    property is used for farming purposes. 2    (b) If the property owner intends to demand just 3compensation, the property owner must serve written notice 4thereof upon the broadband grant recipient within 45 days 5after the anticipated date of broadband deployment as provided 6in the notice to the property owner. Unless timely notice as 7provided in this subsection is given by the property owner to 8the broadband grant recipient, it will be conclusively 9presumed that the property owner does not claim just 10compensation for the burden on the property from the expanded 11use of the right-of-way. 12    (c) Any property owner described in subsection (a) who has 13given timely written notice to the broadband grant recipient, 14as provided in subsection (b), may assert a claim for just 15compensation for diminution in value of the property from the 16expanded use of the right-of-way. A property owner may bring 17suit in an applicable circuit court with jurisdiction to 18enforce a claim for just compensation and to have the amount of 19just compensation determined by a jury. Such action must be 20commenced within 6 months of delivery of the broadband grant 21recipient's original notice of intent to deploy broadband 22infrastructure. A property owner who has not given timely 23notice as provided in subsection (b) is barred from asserting 24such a claim. 25    (d) Neither the property owner's notice to demand just 26compensation, nor the property owner's assertion of a specific   SB3838- 7 -LRB104 20717 AAS 34217 b1claim for just compensation, nor the initiation of any legal 2action to enforce the claim of just compensation shall delay 3or impair the right of the broadband grant recipient to deploy 4broadband infrastructure and provide broadband service within 5or upon, beneath, or over property described in subsection 6(a).  7    Section 25. Sunset. The rights and obligations of 8broadband grant recipients and landowners set forth in this 9Act do not apply on and after January 1, 2030.  10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.